src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/N-unimorphstuff_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
    āinaddālba+N+Pl+Ine: āinaddālbis
    āinaddālba+N+Pl+Ela: āinaddālbist
    āinadkīņ+N+Sg+Nom: āinadkīņ
    āinadkīņ+N+Sg+Gen: āinadkīņ
    āinadkīņ+N+Sg+Dat: āinadkīņõn
    āinadkīņ+N+Sg+Par: āinadkīņõ
    āinadkīņ+N+Sg+Ins: āinadkīņõks
    āinadkīņ+N+Sg+Ill: āinadkīņõ
    āinadkīņ+N+Sg+Ine: āinadkīņšõ
    āinadkīņ+N+Sg+Ela: āinadkīņštõ
    āinadkīņ+N+Pl+Nom: āinadkīņõd
    āinadkīņ+N+Pl+Gen: āinadkīņõd
    āinadkīņ+N+Pl+Dat: āinadkīņõdõn
    āinadkīņ+N+Pl+Par: āinadkīņidi
    āinadkīņ+N+Pl+Ins: āinadkīņõdõks
    āinadkīņ+N+Pl+Ill: āinadkīņiž
    āinadkīņ+N+Pl+Ine: āinadkīņis
    āinadkīņ+N+Pl+Ela: āinadkīņist
    āinadkūj+N+Sg+Nom: āinadkūʼj
    āinadkūj+N+Sg+Gen: āinadkūʼj
    āinadkūj+N+Sg+Dat: āinadkūʼjõn
    āinadkūj+N+Sg+Par: āinadkūʼjõ
    āinadkūj+N+Sg+Ins: āinadkūʼjõks
    āinadkūj+N+Sg+Ill: āinadkūʼjõ
    āinadkūj+N+Sg+Ine: āinadkūʼjsõ
    āinadkūj+N+Sg+Ela: āinadkūʼjstõ
    āinadkūj+N+Pl+Nom: āinadkūʼjd
    āinadkūj+N+Pl+Gen: āinadkūʼjd
    āinadkūj+N+Pl+Dat: āinadkūʼjdõn
    āinadkūj+N+Pl+Par: āinadkūʼjḑi
    āinadkūj+N+Pl+Ins: āinadkūʼjdkõks
    āinadkūj+N+Pl+Ill: āinadkūʼjži
    āinadkūj+N+Pl+Ine: āinadkūʼjši
    āinadkūj+N+Pl+Ela: āinadkūʼjšti
    āinadviedām+N+Sg+Nom: āinadviedām
    āinadviedām+N+Sg+Gen: āinadviedām
    āinadviedām+N+Sg+Dat: āinadviedāmõn
    āinadviedām+N+Sg+Par: āinadviedāmt
    āinadviedām+N+Sg+Ins: āinadviedāmõks
    āinadviedām+N+Sg+Ill: āinadviedāmõ
    āinadviedām+N+Sg+Ine: āinadviedāmõs
    āinadviedām+N+Sg+Ela: āinadviedāmõst
    āinadviedām+N+Pl+Nom: āinadviedāmõd
    āinadviedām+N+Pl+Gen: āinadviedāmõd
    āinadviedām+N+Pl+Dat: āinadviedāmõdõn
    āinadviedām+N+Pl+Par: āinadviedāmidi
    āinadviedām+N+Pl+Ins: āinadviedāmõdõks
    āinadviedām+N+Pl+Ill: āinadviedāmiž
    āinadviedām+N+Pl+Ine: āinadviedāmis
    āinadviedām+N+Pl+Ela: āinadviedāmist
    āinagi+N+Sg+Nom: āinagi
    āinagi+N+Sg+Gen: āinagiz
    āinagi+N+Sg+Dat: āinagizõn
    āinagi+N+Sg+Par: āinagizt
    āinagi+N+Sg+Ins: āinagizõks
    āinagi+N+Sg+Ill: āinagizõ
    āinagi+N+Sg+Ine: āinagizõs
    āinagi+N+Sg+Ela: āinagizõst
    āinagi+N+Pl+Nom: āinagizt
    āinagi+N+Pl+Gen: āinagizt
    āinagi+N+Pl+Dat: āinagiztõn
    āinagi+N+Pl+Par: āinagiži
    āinagi+N+Pl+Ins: āinagiztõks
    āinagi+N+Pl+Ill: āinagižiz
    āinagi+N+Pl+Ine: āinagižis
    āinagi+N+Pl+Ela: āinagižist
    āinajelāmi+N+Sg+Nom: āinajelāmi
    āinajelāmi+N+Sg+Gen: āinajelāmiz
    āinajelāmi+N+Sg+Dat: āinajelāmizõn
    āinajelāmi+N+Sg+Par: āinajelāmizt
    āinajelāmi+N+Sg+Ins: āinajelāmizõks
    āinajelāmi+N+Sg+Ill: āinajelāmizõ
    āinajelāmi+N+Sg+Ine: āinajelāmizõs
    āinajelāmi+N+Sg+Ela: āinajelāmizõst
    āinajelāmi+N+Pl+Nom: āinajelāmizt
    āinajelāmi+N+Pl+Gen: āinajelāmizt
    āinajelāmi+N+Pl+Dat: āinajelāmiztõn
    āinajelāmi+N+Pl+Par: āinajelāmiži
    āinajelāmi+N+Pl+Ins: āinajelāmiztõks
    āinajelāmi+N+Pl+Ill: āinajelāmižiz
    āinajelāmi+N+Pl+Ine: āinajelāmižis
    āinajelāmi+N+Pl+Ela: āinajelāmižist
    āinakerk+N+Sg+Nom: āinakerk
    āinakerk+N+Sg+Gen: āinakerk
    āinakerk+N+Sg+Dat: āinakerkõn
    āinakerk+N+Sg+Par: āinakerkõ
    āinakerk+N+Sg+Ins: āinakerkõks
    āinakerk+N+Sg+Ill: āinakerkõ
    āinakerk+N+Sg+Ine: āinakerksõ
    āinakerk+N+Sg+Ela: āinakerkstõ
    āinakerk+N+Pl+Nom: āinakērkõd
    āinakerk+N+Pl+Gen: āinakērkõd
    āinakerk+N+Pl+Dat: āinakērkõdõn
    āinakerk+N+Pl+Par: āinakērkidi
    āinakerk+N+Pl+Ins: āinakērkõdõks
    āinakerk+N+Pl+Ill: āinakērkiž
    āinakerk+N+Pl+Ine: āinakērkis
    āinakerk+N+Pl+Ela: āinakērkist
    āinakū+N+Sg+Nom: āinakū
    āinakū+N+Sg+Gen: āinakū
    āinakū+N+Sg+Dat: āinakūn
    āinakū+N+Sg+Par: āinakūdõ
    āinakū+N+Sg+Ins: āinakūkõks
    āinakū+N+Sg+Ill: āinakūʼzõ
    āinakū+N+Sg+Ine: āinakūsõ
    āinakū+N+Sg+Ela: āinakūstõ
    āinakū+N+Pl+Nom: āinakūd
    āinakū+N+Pl+Gen: āinakūd
    āinakū+N+Pl+Dat: āinakūdõn
    āinakū+N+Pl+Par: āinakūḑi
    āinakū+N+Pl+Ins: āinakūdkõks
    āinakū+N+Pl+Ill: āinakūʼži
    āinakū+N+Pl+Ine: āinakūši
    āinakū+N+Pl+Ela: āinakūšti
    āinakušt+N+Sg+Nom: āinakušt
    āinakušt+N+Sg+Gen: āinakušt
    āinakušt+N+Sg+Dat: āinakuštõn
    āinakušt+N+Sg+Par: āinakuštõ
    āinakušt+N+Sg+Ins: āinakuštõks
    āinakušt+N+Sg+Ill: āinakuštõ
    āinakušt+N+Sg+Ine: āinakuštõs
    āinakušt+N+Sg+Ela: āinakuštõst
    āinakušt+N+Pl+Nom: āinakuštīd
    āinakušt+N+Pl+Gen: āinakuštīd
    āinakušt+N+Pl+Dat: āinakuštīdõn
    āinakušt+N+Pl+Par: āinakuštīdi
    āinakušt+N+Pl+Ins: āinakuštīdõks
    āinakušt+N+Pl+Ill: āinakuštīž
    āinakušt+N+Pl+Ine: āinakuštīs
    āinakušt+N+Pl+Ela: āinakuštīst
    āinalēḑ+N+Sg+Nom: āinalēʼḑ
    āinalēḑ+N+Sg+Gen: āinalīʼed
    āinalēḑ+N+Sg+Dat: āinalīʼedõn
    āinalēḑ+N+Sg+Par: āinalīʼedtõ
    āinalēḑ+N+Sg+Ins: āinalīʼedkõks
    āinalēḑ+N+Sg+Ill: āinalīʼedõ
    āinalēḑ+N+Sg+Ine: āinalīʼedsõ
    āinalēḑ+N+Sg+Ela: āinalīʼedstõ
    āinalēḑ+N+Pl+Nom: āinalīʼedõd
    āinalēḑ+N+Pl+Gen: āinalīʼedõd
    āinalēḑ+N+Pl+Dat: āinalīʼedõdõn
    āinalēḑ+N+Pl+Par: āinalēʼḑi
    āinalēḑ+N+Pl+Ins: āinalīʼedõdõks
    āinalēḑ+N+Pl+Ill: āinalēʼḑiž
    āinalēḑ+N+Pl+Ine: āinalēʼḑis
    āinalēḑ+N+Pl+Ela: āinalēʼḑist
    āinalipūk+N+Sg+Nom: āinalipūk
    āinalipūk+N+Sg+Gen: āinalipūk
    āinalipūk+N+Sg+Dat: āinalipūkõn
    āinalipūk+N+Sg+Par: āinalipūkt
    āinalipūk+N+Sg+Ins: āinalipūkõks
    āinalipūk+N+Sg+Ill: āinalipūkõ
    āinalipūk+N+Sg+Ine: āinalipūkõs
    āinalipūk+N+Sg+Ela: āinalipūkõst
    āinalipūk+N+Pl+Nom: āinalipūkõd
    āinalipūk+N+Pl+Gen: āinalipūkõd
    āinalipūk+N+Pl+Dat: āinalipūkõdõn
    āinalipūk+N+Pl+Par: āinalipūkidi
    āinalipūk+N+Pl+Ins: āinalipūkõdõks
    āinalipūk+N+Pl+Ill: āinalipūkiž
    āinalipūk+N+Pl+Ine: āinalipūkis
    āinalipūk+N+Pl+Ela: āinalipūkist
    āinalipskõz+N+Sg+Nom: āinalipskõz
    āinalipskõz+N+Sg+Gen: āinalipskõ
    āinalipskõz+N+Sg+Dat: āinalipskõn
    āinalipskõz+N+Sg+Par: āinalipskõzt
    āinalipskõz+N+Sg+Ins: āinalipskõks
    āinalipskõz+N+Sg+Ill: [āinalipskõ, āinalipskõz]
    āinalipskõz+N+Sg+Ine: āinalipskõs
    āinalipskõz+N+Sg+Ela: āinalipskõst
    āinalipskõz+N+Pl+Nom: āinalipskõd
    āinalipskõz+N+Pl+Gen: āinalipskõd
    āinalipskõz+N+Pl+Dat: āinalipskõdõn
    āinalipskõz+N+Pl+Par: āinalipskidi
    āinalipskõz+N+Pl+Ins: āinalipskõdõks
    āinalipskõz+N+Pl+Ill: āinalipskiž
    āinalipskõz+N+Pl+Ine: āinalipskis
    āinalipskõz+N+Pl+Ela: āinalipskist
    āinalõv+N+Sg+Nom: āinalõʼv
    āinalõv+N+Sg+Gen: āinalõʼv
    āinalõv+N+Sg+Dat: āinalõʼvvõn
    āinalõv+N+Sg+Par: āinalõʼvvõ
    āinalõv+N+Sg+Ins: āinalõʼvvõks
    āinalõv+N+Sg+Ill: āinalõʼvvõ
    āinalõv+N+Sg+Ine: āinalõʼvsõ
    āinalõv+N+Sg+Ela: āinalõʼvstõ
    āinalõv+N+Pl+Nom: āinalõʼvd
    āinalõv+N+Pl+Gen: āinalõʼvd
    āinalõv+N+Pl+Dat: āinalõʼvdõn
    āinalõv+N+Pl+Par: āinalõʼvḑi
    āinalõv+N+Pl+Ins: āinalõʼvdõks
    āinalõv+N+Pl+Ill: āinalõʼvži
    āinalõv+N+Pl+Ine: āinalõʼvši
    āinalõv+N+Pl+Ela: āinalõʼvšti
    āinamǭ+N+Sg+Nom: āinamǭ
    āinamǭ+N+Sg+Gen: āinamǭ
    āinamǭ+N+Sg+Dat: āinamǭn
    āinamǭ+N+Sg+Par: āinamǭdõ
    āinamǭ+N+Sg+Ins: āinamǭkõks
    āinamǭ+N+Sg+Ill: āinamǭʼzõ
    āinamǭ+N+Sg+Ine: āinamǭsõ
    āinamǭ+N+Sg+Ela: āinamǭstõ
    āinamǭ+N+Pl+Nom: āinamǭd
    āinamǭ+N+Pl+Gen: āinamǭd
    āinamǭ+N+Pl+Dat: āinamǭdõn
    āinamǭ+N+Pl+Par: āinamǭḑi
    āinamǭ+N+Pl+Ins: āinamǭdkõks
    āinamǭ+N+Pl+Ill: āinamǭʼži
    āinamǭ+N+Pl+Ine: āinamǭši
    āinamǭ+N+Pl+Ela: āinamǭšti
    āinanītiji+N+Sg+Nom: āinanītiji
    āinanītiji+N+Sg+Gen: āinanītijiz
    āinanītiji+N+Sg+Dat: āinanītijizõn
    āinanītiji+N+Sg+Par: [āinanītijizt, āinanītijit]
    āinanītiji+N+Sg+Ins: āinanītijizõks
    āinanītiji+N+Sg+Ill: āinanītijizõ
    āinanītiji+N+Sg+Ine: āinanītijizõs
    āinanītiji+N+Sg+Ela: āinanītijizõst
    āinanītiji+N+Pl+Nom: āinanītijid
    āinanītiji+N+Pl+Gen: āinanītijid
    āinanītiji+N+Pl+Dat: āinanītijidõn
    āinanītiji+N+Pl+Par: āinanītijidi
    āinanītiji+N+Pl+Ins: āinanītijidõks
    āinanītiji+N+Pl+Ill: āinanītijiž
    āinanītiji+N+Pl+Ine: āinanītijis
    āinanītiji+N+Pl+Ela: āinanītijisti
    āinarovzt+N+Pl+Nom: āinaroʼvzt
    āinarovzt+N+Pl+Gen: āinaroʼvzt
    āinarovzt+N+Pl+Dat: āinaroʼvztõn
    āinarovzt+N+Pl+Par: āinaroʼvžti
    āinarovzt+N+Pl+Ins: āinaroʼvztõks
    āinarovzt+N+Pl+Ill: āinaroʼvztiž
    āinarovzt+N+Pl+Ine: āinaroʼvztis
    āinarovzt+N+Pl+Ela: āinaroʼvztist
    āinatupūks+N+Sg+Nom: āinatupūks
    āinatupūks+N+Sg+Gen: āinatupūks
    āinatupūks+N+Sg+Dat: āinatupūksõn
    āinatupūks+N+Sg+Par: āinatupūkst
    āinatupūks+N+Sg+Ins: āinatupūksõks
    āinatupūks+N+Sg+Ill: āinatupūksõ
    āinatupūks+N+Sg+Ine: āinatupūksõs
    āinatupūks+N+Sg+Ela: āinatupūksõst
    āinatupūks+N+Pl+Nom: āinatupūkst
    āinatupūks+N+Pl+Gen: āinatupūkst
    āinatupūks+N+Pl+Dat: āinatupūkstõn
    āinatupūks+N+Pl+Par: āinatupūkši
    āinatupūks+N+Pl+Ins: āinatupūkstõks
    āinatupūks+N+Pl+Ill: āinatupūkšiz
    āinatupūks+N+Pl+Ine: āinatupūkšis
    āinatupūks+N+Pl+Ela: āinatupūkšist
    āinatus+N+Sg+Nom: āinatus
    āinatus+N+Sg+Gen: āinatus
    āinatus+N+Sg+Dat: āinatussõn
    āinatus+N+Sg+Par: āinatussõ
    āinatus+N+Sg+Ins: āinatussõks
    āinatus+N+Sg+Ill: āinatussõ
    āinatus+N+Sg+Ine: āinatussõs
    āinatus+N+Sg+Ela: āinatussõst
    āinatus+N+Pl+Nom: āinatusūd
    āinatus+N+Pl+Gen: āinatusūd
    āinatus+N+Pl+Dat: āinatusūdõn
    āinatus+N+Pl+Par: āinatusīdi
    āinatus+N+Pl+Ins: āinatusūdõks
    āinatus+N+Pl+Ill: āinatusīž
    āinatus+N+Pl+Ine: āinatusīs
    āinatus+N+Pl+Ela: āinatusīst
    āinavǭl+N+Sg+Nom: āinavǭl
    āinavǭl+N+Sg+Gen: āinavǭl
    āinavǭl+N+Sg+Dat: āinavǭlõn
    āinavǭl+N+Sg+Par: āinavǭlõ
    āinavǭl+N+Sg+Ins: āinavǭlõks
    āinavǭl+N+Sg+Ill: āinavǭlõ
    āinavǭl+N+Sg+Ine: āinavǭlsõ
    āinavǭl+N+Sg+Ela: [āinavǭlstõ, āinavǭlst]
    āinavǭl+N+Pl+Nom: āinavǭlõd
    āinavǭl+N+Pl+Gen: āinavǭlõd
    āinavǭl+N+Pl+Dat: āinavǭlõdõn
    āinavǭl+N+Pl+Par: āinavǭlidi
    āinavǭl+N+Pl+Ins: āinavǭlõdõks
    āinavǭl+N+Pl+Ill: āinavǭliž
    āinavǭl+N+Pl+Ine: āinavǭlis
    āinavǭl+N+Pl+Ela: āinavǭlist
    āiraz+N+Sg+Nom: āiraz
    āiraz+N+Sg+Gen: airõ
    āiraz+N+Sg+Dat: airõn
    āiraz+N+Sg+Par: āirazt
    āiraz+N+Sg+Ins: airõks
    āiraz+N+Sg+Ill: [airõ, airõz]
    āiraz+N+Sg+Ine: airõs
    āiraz+N+Sg+Ela: airõst
    āiraz+N+Pl+Nom: airõd
    āiraz+N+Pl+Gen: airõd
    āiraz+N+Pl+Dat: airõdõn
    āiraz+N+Pl+Par: airidi
    āiraz+N+Pl+Ins: airõdõks
    āiraz+N+Pl+Ill: airiž
    āiraz+N+Pl+Ine: airis
    āiraz+N+Pl+Ela: airist
    airõläbḑi+N+Sg+Nom: airõläʼbḑi
    airõläbḑi+N+Sg+Gen: airõläʼbḑiz
    airõläbḑi+N+Sg+Dat: airõläʼbḑin
    airõläbḑi+N+Sg+Par: airõläʼbḑizt
    airõläbḑi+N+Sg+Ins: airõläʼbḑiks
    airõläbḑi+N+Sg+Ill: airõläʼbḑizõ
    airõläbḑi+N+Sg+Ine: airõläʼbḑis
    airõläbḑi+N+Sg+Ela: airõläʼbḑist
    airõläbḑi+N+Pl+Nom: airõläʼbḑid
    airõläbḑi+N+Pl+Gen: airõläʼbḑid
    airõläbḑi+N+Pl+Dat: airõläʼbḑidõn
    airõläbḑi+N+Pl+Par: airõläʼbḑidi
    airõläbḑi+N+Pl+Ins: airõläʼbḑidõks
    airõläbḑi+N+Pl+Ill: airõläʼbḑiž
    airõläbḑi+N+Pl+Ine: airõläʼbḑisi
    airõläbḑi+N+Pl+Ela: airõläʼbḑisti
    airõlǭja+N+Sg+Nom: airõlǭja
    airõlǭja+N+Sg+Gen: airõlǭja
    airõlǭja+N+Sg+Dat: airõlǭjan
    airõlǭja+N+Sg+Par: airõlaijõ
    airõlǭja+N+Sg+Ins: airõlǭjaks
    airõlǭja+N+Sg+Ill: airõlaijõ
    airõlǭja+N+Sg+Ine: airõlǭjas
    airõlǭja+N+Sg+Ela: airõlǭjast
    airõlǭja+N+Pl+Nom: airõlǭjad
    airõlǭja+N+Pl+Gen: airõlǭjad
    airõlǭja+N+Pl+Dat: airõlǭjadõn
    airõlǭja+N+Pl+Par: airõlaijḑi
    airõlǭja+N+Pl+Ins: airõlǭjadõks
    airõlǭja+N+Pl+Ill: airõlaijži
    airõlǭja+N+Pl+Ine: airõlaijši
    airõlǭja+N+Pl+Ela: airõlaijšti
    airõnikā+N+Sg+Nom: airõnikā
    airõnikā+N+Sg+Gen: airõnikā
    airõnikā+N+Sg+Dat: airõnikān
    airõnikā+N+Sg+Par: airõnikkõ
    airõnikā+N+Sg+Ins: airõnikāks
    airõnikā+N+Sg+Ill: airõnikkõ
    airõnikā+N+Sg+Ine: airõnikās
    airõnikā+N+Sg+Ela: airõnikāst
    airõnikā+N+Pl+Nom: airõnikād
    airõnikā+N+Pl+Gen: airõnikād
    airõnikā+N+Pl+Dat: airõnikādõn
    airõnikā+N+Pl+Par: airõnikīdi
    airõnikā+N+Pl+Ins: airõnikādõks
    airõnikā+N+Pl+Ill: airõnikīž
    airõnikā+N+Pl+Ine: airõnikīs
    airõnikā+N+Pl+Ela: airõnikīst
    āistar+N+Sg+Nom: āistar
